Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3801
Act, how cited; declaration of purpose.

(1) Sections 48-3801 to 48-3811 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act.

(2) The purpose of the act is to provide eligible employees in Nebraska the right to earn paid sick time for personal or family health needs and provide certain provisions naturally and necessarily related to that purpose.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 436, § 1.